Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1 General Provisions
4-51-116. Lottery retailer advisory board.

The chair of the board of directors shall appoint a lottery retailer advisory board to be composed of twelve (12) lottery retailers, four (4) from each grand division, representing the broadest possible spectrum of geographical, racial, and business characteristics of lottery retailers. The function of the advisory board shall be to advise the board of directors on retail aspects of the lottery and to present the concerns of lottery retailers throughout the state.

Members appointed to the lottery retailer advisory board shall serve terms of two (2) years; provided, however, that six (6) of the initial appointees shall serve terms of one (1) year.

The advisory board shall establish its own rules and internal operating procedures. The advisory board may report to the board of directors or to the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives in writing at any time. The board of directors may invite the advisory board to make an oral presentation to the board of directors at regular meetings of the board.

As an operating expense of the corporation, members of the advisory board shall receive a per diem not to exceed the per diem provided to members of the general assembly pursuant to § 3-1-106, for each day's service spent in the performance of the duties and responsibilities of the advisory board.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2012, ch. 925, § 16; 2013, ch. 236, § 65.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch.1, part 2.

4-51-117. Lottery retailer contract.

No lottery retailer contract shall be transferable or assignable.

No lottery retailer shall contract with any person for lottery goods or services except with the approval of the board.

Lottery tickets and shares shall only be sold by the retailer stated on the lottery retailer certificate of authority.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-118. Retailer fidelity fund — Retailer fee — Reserve account to cover losses — Retailer bond.

The corporation may establish a fidelity fund separate from all other funds and shall assess each retailer a one-time fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per sales location. In accordance with § 4-51-106, the corporation is authorized to invest the funds or place such funds in one (1) or more interest-bearing accounts. Moneys deposited to the fund may be used to cover losses the corporation experiences due to nonfeasance, misfeasance or malfeasance of a lottery retailer. In addition, the funds may be used to purchase blanket bonds covering the corporation against losses from all lottery retailers. At the end of each fiscal year, the corporation shall pay to the lottery for education account any amount in the fidelity fund that exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), and such funds shall be commingled with and treated as net proceeds from the lottery.

A reserve account may be established as a general operating expense account to cover amounts deemed uncollectable. The corporation shall establish procedures for minimizing any losses that may be experienced for the foregoing reasons and shall exercise and exhaust all available options in such procedures prior to amounts being written off to this account.

The corporation may require any retailer to post an appropriate bond, as determined by the corporation, using an insurance company acceptable to the corporation; provided, however, that after one (1) full fiscal year of lottery operations the amount of any such bond shall not exceed the applicable district sales average of lottery tickets for two (2) quarterly billing periods.

In its discretion, the corporation may allow a retailer to deposit and maintain with the corporation securities that are interest bearing or accruing. Securities eligible under this subdivision (c)(2) shall be limited to:

Certificates of deposit issued by solvent banks or savings associations organized and existing under the laws of this state or under the laws of the United States;

United States bonds, notes, and bills for which the full faith and credit of the United States is pledged for the payment of principal and interest;

Federal agency securities by an agency or instrumentality of the United States government.

Such securities shall be held in trust in the name of the corporation.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-119. Retail contract — Cancellation, suspension, revocation or termination.

Any retail contract executed by the corporation pursuant to this chapter shall specify the reasons for which a contract may be cancelled, suspended, revoked, or terminated by the corporation, which reasons shall include, but not be limited to:

Commission of a violation of this chapter, a regulation, or a policy or procedure of the corporation;

Commission of a violation of title 39, chapter 17, part 6, relative to lottery offenses;

Failure to accurately or timely account for lottery tickets, lottery games, revenues, or prizes as required by the corporation;

Commission of any fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation;

Insufficient sales;

Conduct prejudicial to public confidence in the lottery;

The retailer filing for or being placed in bankruptcy or receivership;

Any material change as determined in the sole discretion of the corporation in any matter considered by the corporation in executing the contract with the retailer; or

Failure to meet any of the objective criteria established by the corporation pursuant to this chapter.

If, in the discretion of the chief executive officer, or such officer's designee, cancellation, denial, revocation, suspension, or rejection of renewal of a lottery retailer contract is in the best interest of the lottery, the public welfare, or the state, the chief executive officer, or such officer's designee, may cancel, suspend, revoke, or terminate, after notice and a right to a hearing, any contract issued pursuant to this chapter. Such contract may, however, be temporarily suspended by the chief executive officer or a designee without prior notice pending any prosecution, hearing, or investigation, whether by a third party or by the chief executive officer. A contract may be suspended, revoked or terminated by the chief executive officer, or such officer's designee, for any one (1) or more of the reasons enumerated in subsection (a). Any hearing held shall be conducted by the chief executive officer or such officer's designee. A party to the contract aggrieved by the decision of the chief executive officer, or such officer's designee, may appeal the adverse decision to the board. Such appeal shall be pursuant to the regulations, policies, and procedures set by the board and is not subject to the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-120. Lottery retailers — Fiduciary duty — Protection against loss.

All proceeds from the sale of the lottery tickets or shares shall constitute a trust fund until paid to the corporation either directly or through the corporation's authorized collection representative. A lottery retailer and officers of a lottery retailer's business shall have a fiduciary duty to preserve and account for lottery proceeds and lottery retailers shall be personally liable for all proceeds. Proceeds shall include unsold instant tickets received by a lottery retailer and cash proceeds of the sale of any lottery products, net of allowable sales commissions and credit for lottery prizes sold to or paid to winners by lottery retailers. Sales proceeds and unused instant tickets shall be delivered to the corporation or its authorized collection representative upon demand.

Pursuant to § 4-51-105(a)(3), the corporation shall adopt and enforce policies designed to safeguard and limit the opportunity for loss of lottery proceeds that are not in the possession of the corporation. Such policies may include, but are not limited to:

Requirements governing financial institutions into which retailers shall deposit lottery proceeds;

Requirements for the establishment of separate accounts for the deposit of lottery proceeds by retailers;

The timing of deposit of lottery proceeds by retailers; and

The timing of withdrawal of funds from retailer accounts by the corporation.

Any policies designed to safeguard and limit the opportunity for loss of lottery proceeds, and any revisions to such policies, shall be filed with the state funding board.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, whenever any person who receives proceeds from the sale of lottery tickets or shares in the capacity of a lottery retailer becomes insolvent or dies insolvent, the proceeds due the corporation from such person or that person's estate shall have preference over all debts or demands.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Cross-References. Wills, title 32.

4-51-121. Lottery retailer — Rental payments based on percentage of retail sales.

If a lottery retailer's rental payments for the business premises are contractually computed, in whole or in part, on the basis of a percentage of retail sales and such computation of retail sales is not explicitly defined to include sales of tickets or shares in a state-operated or state-managed lottery, only the compensation received by the lottery retailer from the corporation may be considered in determining the amount of the lottery retail sales for purposes of computing the rental payment.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-122. Restrictions on sales.

In accordance with title 39, chapter 17, part 6:

No person shall sell a ticket or share at a price other than the price established by the corporation unless authorized in writing by the chief executive officer;

No person, other than a duly certified lottery retailer, shall sell lottery tickets or shares;

This subsection (a) shall not be construed to prevent a person who may lawfully purchase tickets or shares from making a gift of lottery tickets or shares to another;

This subsection (a) shall not be construed to prevent a merchant who may lawfully purchase tickets or shares from making a gift of lottery tickets or shares as a means of promoting goods or services to customers or prospective customers subject to prior approval by the corporation; and

This subsection (a) shall not be construed to prohibit the corporation from designating certain of its agents and employees to sell or give lottery tickets or shares directly to the public.

No lottery retailer shall sell a lottery ticket or share except from the locations listed in the retailer's contract and as evidenced by the retailer's certificate of authorization unless the corporation authorizes in writing any temporary location not listed in the retailer's contract.

In accordance with title 39, chapter 17, part 6, no lottery tickets or shares shall be sold to persons under eighteen (18) years of age; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter or title 39, chapter 17, part 6, prohibits the purchase of a lottery ticket or share by a person eighteen (18) years of age or older for the purpose of making a gift to any person of any age. In such case, the corporation shall direct payment of proceeds of any lottery prize to an adult member of the person's family or a legal representative of the person on behalf of such person.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-123. Attachments, garnishments, or executions withheld from lottery prizes — Validity of lottery tickets or shares — Prize restrictions — Electronic or mechanical machines — Unclaimed prizes.

Except as otherwise provided in part 2 of this chapter, attachments, garnishments, or executions authorized and issued pursuant to law shall be withheld from the proceeds of any lottery prize if timely served upon the corporation.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to a retailer.

The corporation shall adopt regulations, policies, and procedures to establish a system of verifying the validity of lottery tickets or shares claimed to win prizes and to effect payment of such prizes, except that:

No prize, any portion of a prize, or any right of any person to a prize awarded shall be assignable. Any prize or any portion of a prize remaining unpaid at the death of a prize winner shall be paid to the estate of the deceased prize winner or to the trustee of a trust established by the deceased prize winner as settlor if a copy of the trust document or instrument has been filed with the corporation along with a notarized letter of direction from the settlor and no written notice of revocation has been received by the corporation prior to the settlor's death. Following a settlor's death and prior to any payment to such a successor trustee, the corporation shall obtain from the trustee a written agreement to indemnify and hold the corporation harmless with respect to any claims that may be asserted against the corporation arising from payment to or through the trust. This section shall prevail over any inconsistent provisions of § 47-9-406. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section to the contrary, any person, pursuant to an appropriate judicial order, shall be paid the prize to which a winner is entitled;

No prize shall be paid:

Arising from claimed tickets that are stolen, counterfeit, altered, fraudulent, unissued, produced, or issued in error, unreadable, not received, or not recorded by the corporation within applicable deadlines;

Lacking in captions that conform and agree with the play symbols as appropriate to the particular lottery game involved; or

Not in compliance with such additional specific regulations and public or confidential validation and security tests of the corporation appropriate to the particular lottery game involved;

No particular prize in any lottery game shall be paid more than once and, in the event of a determination that more than one (1) claimant is entitled to a particular prize, the sole remedy of such multiple claimants is the award to each of them of an equal share in the prize; and

A holder of a winning cash ticket or share from any lottery game conducted by a drawing shall claim a cash prize within one hundred eighty (180) days after the drawing in which the cash prize was won or the end of the game as determined by the corporation, whichever is later. If a multistate or multisovereign lottery game requires, by rule or regulation, a period of time less than one hundred eighty (180) days for redemption of a winning ticket, such period shall apply for that lottery game.

In any Tennessee lottery game in which the player may determine instantly if the player has won or lost, such player shall claim a cash prize within ninety (90) days, or for a multistate or multisovereign lottery game within one hundred eighty (180) days, after the end of the lottery game.

If a valid claim is not made for a cash prize within the applicable period, the cash prize shall constitute an unclaimed prize for purposes of this section.

No prize shall be paid upon a ticket or share purchased or sold in violation of this chapter. Any such prize shall constitute an unclaimed prize for purposes of this section.

The corporation is discharged of all liability upon payment of a prize.

No ticket or share shall be purchased by and no prize shall be paid to:

Any member of the board of directors;

Any officer or employee of the corporation; or

To any member of the immediate family of any person described in subdivision (f)(1)(A) or (f)(1)(B) residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of residence of any such person.

No ticket or share shall be purchased by and no prize shall be paid to any officer, employee, agent, or subcontractor of any vendor, or to any member of the immediate family residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of residence of any such person if such officer, employee, agent, or subcontractor has access to confidential information that may compromise the integrity of the lottery.

No lottery game utilizing an electronic or mechanical machine may use a machine that:

Dispenses coins or currency; or

Accepts debit or credit cards.

Unclaimed prize money shall not constitute net lottery proceeds and, for the purposes of § 4-51-111(a), shall not be distributed as lottery proceeds. Title 66, chapter 29 shall not apply to unclaimed prize money of the corporation. At the end of each fiscal year, one hundred percent (100%) of any unclaimed prize money shall be deposited in the after school programs special account created in accordance with § 4-51-111; provided, however, that, if the unclaimed prizes in any fiscal year total more than eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000), then the excess shall accrue to the fund balance of the lottery for education account.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2004, ch. 841, § 4; 2006, ch. 940, § 2; 2007, ch. 95, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 841, § 8 provided that the amendment by § 4 of that act only apply to tickets or shares sold on or after July 1, 2004.

Law Reviews.

So Your Client Just Won the Lottery. (Dan W. Holbrook), 40 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2004).

Attorney General Opinions. Uses of unclaimed lottery prize money, OAG 03-066, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (5/22/03).

4-51-124. Confidential information — Criminal history checks — Lottery integrity.

All records and information in the possession of the corporation are open for inspection by members of the public unless otherwise provided by state law. The following records or information in the possession of the corporation shall be treated as confidential and shall be exempt from § 10-7-503:

Trade secrets, as such term is defined in § 47-25-1702;

Security measures, systems, or procedures;

Security reports;

Proposals received pursuant to personal service, professional service, consultant service contract regulations, and related records, including evaluations and memoranda; provided, however, that such information shall be available for public inspection after the completion of evaluation of such proposals by the corporation. Sealed bids for the purchase of goods and services, and leases of real property, and individual purchase records, including evaluations and memoranda relating to such bids; provided, however, that such information shall be available for public inspection after the completion of evaluation of such bids by the corporation. Internal audit reviews of the corporation including any documentation and memoranda relating to such audits; provided, however, that such information shall be available for public inspection after finalization of such audits by the corporation;

The following records or information of an employee of the corporation in the possession of the corporation in its capacity as an employer shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public: unpublished telephone numbers; bank account information; social security number; driver license information except where driving or operating a vehicle is part of the employee's job description or job duties or incidental to the performance of the employee's job; and the same information of immediate family members or household members;

Information made confidential by this subdivision (a)(5) shall be redacted wherever possible and nothing in this subdivision (a)(5) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, a document, or data file contains confidential information;

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(5) shall be construed to limit access to these records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions;

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(5) shall be construed to close any personnel records of an employee of the corporation that are currently open under state law;

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(5) shall be construed to limit access to information made confidential under this subdivision (a)(5), when the employee expressly authorizes the release of such information;

Information obtained pursuant to investigations that is otherwise confidential;

Identifying information obtained from prize winners including, but not limited to, home and work addresses, telephone numbers, social security numbers, and any other information that could reasonably be used to locate the whereabouts of an individual; provided, however, that:

The corporation shall disclose any relevant information to a claimant agency pursuant to part 2 of this chapter necessary to establish or enforce a claim against a debtor as defined in part 2 of this chapter;

The corporation may disclose a lottery prize winner's name, home state, hometown, and, if authorized by the prize winner, any other information for marketing, advertising, or promotional purposes; and

The corporation shall disclose any information not subject to subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) or (a)(6), that is otherwise necessary to assist any federal, state, or local entity in the performance of its statutory or regulatory duties;

Medical records or medical information of an employee of the corporation, and medical records or information of family members of an employee of the corporation in the possession of the corporation shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public;

All information relative to the hiring or retention of the chief executive officer or president;

All information relative to prospective lottery games and security and other sensitive information relative to current lottery games; and

Any information concerning lottery sales made by lottery retailers unless otherwise provided by law.

Meetings of the corporation shall be open to the public pursuant to title 8, chapter 44, part 1; provided, however, that portions of meetings devoted to discussing information deemed confidential pursuant to this section or deemed confidential pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5 are exempt from title 8, chapter 44, part 1.

Information deemed confidential pursuant to subsection (a) is exempt from § 10-7-503. Meetings or portions of meetings devoted to discussing information deemed confidential pursuant to subsection (a) are exempt from title 8, chapter 44, part 1.

The corporation shall perform or cause to be performed full criminal history record checks prior to the execution of any vendor contract.

The corporation, or its authorized agent, shall:

Conduct criminal history record checks and credit investigations on all potential retailers; provided, however, that the corporation, or its authorized agent, may conduct or cause to be conducted criminal history record checks and credit investigations on employees of potential and authorized lottery retailers at any time;

Supervise ticket or share validation and lottery drawings;

Inspect, at times determined solely by the corporation, the facilities of any vendor or lottery retailer in order to determine the integrity of the vendor's product or the operations of the retailer in order to determine whether the vendor or the retailer is in compliance with its contract;

Report any suspected violations of this chapter to the appropriate district attorney, or the attorney general and reporter, and to any law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction over the violation; and

Upon request, provide assistance to any district attorney, the attorney general and reporter, or a law enforcement agency investigating a violation of this chapter or title 39, chapter 17, parts 5 or 6.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2004, ch. 841, § 7.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-51-125. Intelligence sharing, reciprocal use, or restricted use agreements.

The corporation may enter into intelligence sharing, reciprocal use, or restricted use agreements with the federal government, law enforcement agencies, lottery regulation agencies, and gaming enforcement agencies of other jurisdictions that provide for and regulate the use of information provided and received pursuant to the agreement.

Records, documents, and information in the possession of the corporation received pursuant to an intelligence-sharing, reciprocal use, or restricted use agreement entered into by the corporation with a federal department or agency, any law enforcement agency, the lottery regulation agency, or gaming enforcement agency of any jurisdiction shall be considered investigative records of a law enforcement agency and are not subject to § 10-7-503 and shall not be released under any condition without the permission of the person or agency providing the record or information.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-51-126. Procurement contracts — Competitive bidding.

All major procurement contracts shall be competitively bid pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the board pursuant to § 4-51-104(c)(5) and approved by the procurement commission pursuant to subdivision (a)(2). Such policies and procedures shall be designed to allow the selection of proposals that provide the greatest long-term benefit to the state, the greatest integrity for the corporation and the best service and products for the public. The requirement for competitive bidding does not apply in the case of a single vendor having exclusive rights to offer a particular service or product.

Policies and procedures concerning competitive bidding of major procurement contracts for on-line and instant ticket lottery vendors and for advertising contracts estimated to be valued in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be filed with the procurement commission for review in accordance with subdivision (a)(2)(B).

Notwithstanding title 12, chapter 3, part 4 to the contrary, the procurement commission shall review and approve, or disapprove, such policies and procedures within five (5) working days after submission.

Upon approval, such policies and procedures shall become effective immediately and shall remain effective until amended, altered, or repealed.

If not approved, the procurement commission shall file a statement with the corporation stating its basis for nonapproval. The corporation shall make any necessary revisions and file such revised policies and procedures with the procurement commission for review and approval in a manner consistent with this subdivision (a)(2).

If the procurement commission neither approves nor disapproves of such policies and procedures within five (5) working days, such policies and procedures shall become effective after the tenth calendar day and shall remain effective until amended, altered, or repealed.

Any amendment to such policies and procedures shall be filed with the procurement commission for review and approval in a manner consistent with this subdivision (a)(2).

In any bidding process, the corporation may administer its own bidding and procurement or may utilize the services of the department of general services or other state agency or subdivision thereof.

There shall be a lottery procurement panel consisting of the secretary of state, state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration. The commissioner of finance and administration shall serve as chair of the panel, and the department of finance and administration shall provide staff support to the panel as needed.

Prior to issuance of procurement documents for major procurement contracts regarding on-line and instant ticket lottery vendors, and any advertising contract estimated to be valued in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), the corporation shall file such procurement documents with the lottery procurement panel. Such panel may individually, or collectively, review the procurement document and submit comments, if any, to the corporation within five (5) working days after submission to the panel for review. After receiving comments from the panel and, in any event, after the tenth calendar day after submission to the panel for review, the corporation may:

Revise such procurement document based on the comments of the panel. Any revised procurement document based on the comments of the panel shall be filed with the panel prior to issuance; or

Revise such procurement document in a manner not based on the comments of the panel. Any revised procurement document not based on the comments of the panel shall be filed with the panel and reviewed by the panel in accordance with this subsection (c) prior to issuance; or

Issue the procurement document without revision. Notwithstanding this subdivision (c)(2) to the contrary, the corporation may revise such procurement document prior to the fifth working day provided that the revised procurement document is filed with the panel and reviewed in accordance with this subsection (c) prior to issuance.

Comments of the procurement panel, or failure of the corporation to modify procurement documents based on such comments, shall not confer any rights or constitute a basis for a challenge by a vendor to the procurement process.

If the corporation determines that the requirement for competitive bidding does not apply to a major procurement contract regarding an on-line or instant ticket lottery vendor because such vendor is a single vendor having exclusive rights to offer a particular service or product, then, immediately upon making such a determination, the corporation shall file with the panel a notice of its intent not to require competitive bidding and a statement of reasons supporting that determination.

Executed copies of major procurement contracts regarding on-line and instant ticket lottery vendors, and any advertising contract valued in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), shall be filed with the lottery procurement panel within five (5) working days of execution.

Procurement documents, contracts, and any other documentation, or portions thereof, filed with the lottery procurement panel by the corporation shall be subject to § 4-51-124. Such information shall retain its confidentiality, if any, and shall only be used by the panel in the performance of its official duties.

Except for information deemed confidential pursuant to § 4-51-124, major procurement contracts entered into by the corporation regarding on-line and instant ticket lottery vendors, and any advertising contract valued in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), shall be posted, via link to “Major Procurement Contracts,” on the website of the Tennessee education lottery corporation. The corporation may post additional major procurement contracts.

The corporation shall post all major procurement contract procurement documents, via link to “Major Procurement Opportunities,” on the website of the Tennessee education lottery corporation.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

Compiler's Note. The Tennessee education lottery corporation web site may be found at the following url: https://tnlottery.com/.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee education lottery corporation: contract amendments. OAG 10-73, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (5/21/10).

4-51-127. Appealing final actions of the board.

Any retailer, vendor, or applicant for a retailer or vendor contract aggrieved by a final action of the board may appeal that decision to the chancery court of Davidson County.

The chancery court of Davidson County shall hear appeals from decisions of the board and based upon the record of the proceedings before the board may reverse the decision of the board only if the appellant proves the decision to be:

Clearly erroneous;

Arbitrary and capricious;

Procured by fraud;

A result of substantial misconduct by the board; or

Contrary to the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Tennessee or this chapter.

The chancery court may remand an appeal to the board to conduct further hearings.

Any person who appeals the award of a major procurement contract for the supply of a lottery ticket system, share system, or an on-line or other mechanical or electronic system shall be liable for all costs of appeal and defense in the event the appeal is denied or the contract award is upheld. Costs of appeal and defense shall include, but are not limited to, court costs, bond and attorney's fees; provided that, upon motion of the corporation, such costs shall also include any loss of income to the corporation resulting from institution of the appeal if the court finds the appeal to have been frivolous.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-128. Disposition of funds.

The corporation may borrow, or accept and expend, in accordance with this chapter, such moneys as may be received from any source, including income from the corporation's operations, for effectuating its corporate purposes, including the payment of the initial expenses of initiation, administration, and operation of the corporation and the lottery, and other lottery related purposes, including the payment of the initial expenses of initiation, administration, and operation of educational programs and purposes.

The corporation shall be self-sustaining and self-funded. Moneys in the state general fund shall not be used or obligated to pay the expenses of the corporation or prizes of the lottery and no claim for the payment of an expense of the lottery or prizes of the lottery may be made against any moneys other than moneys credited to the corporation operating account.

The corporation may purchase, lease, or lease-purchase such goods or services as are necessary for effectuating the purposes of this chapter. The corporation may make procurements that integrate functions such as lottery game design, lottery ticket distribution to retailers, supply of goods and services, and advertising. In all procurement decisions, the corporation shall take into account the particularly sensitive nature of the state lottery and shall act to promote and ensure security, honesty, fairness, and integrity in the operation and administration of the lottery and the objectives of raising net lottery proceeds for the benefit of educational programs and purposes.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-129. Financial reports, audits, and records.

To ensure the financial integrity of the lottery, the corporation, through its board of directors, shall:

Submit quarterly and annual reports to the governor, the state and local government committee of the senate, the state government committee of the house of representatives, the comptroller of the treasury and the state treasurer, disclosing the total lottery revenues, prize disbursements, operating expenses, and administrative expenses of the corporation during the reporting period. The annual report shall additionally describe the organizational structure of the corporation and summarize the functions performed by each organizational division within the corporation;

Adopt a system of internal audits; all audits performed by the internal audit staff of the corporation shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 4-3-304(9);

Maintain weekly or more frequent records of lottery transactions, including the distribution of tickets or shares to retailers, revenues received, claims for prizes, prizes paid, prizes forfeited, and other financial transactions of the corporation;

Be subject to audits by the comptroller of the treasury in accordance with § 8-4-109. Such audits may be undertaken at any time at the sole discretion of the comptroller; provided, however, that the comptroller shall conduct, or contract for, an annual financial audit of the corporation. The comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designated representatives, shall have access to the corporation's books, records, and accounts whenever deemed necessary by such office. The comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designated representatives, shall have access to any and all of the records of the corporation's distributing agencies, lottery vendors or lottery retailers that relate to the operation, administration or promotion of the lottery. Except as provided in subdivision (4)(B), the corporation may, with prior notice to the comptroller of the treasury, contract with a licensed independent certified public accountant or firm for additional audits concerning any phase of the operations of the corporation; provided, however, that the licensed certified public accountant or firm shall have no financial interest in any vendor with whom the corporation is under contract. The corporation shall be responsible, as an operating expense, for reimbursement of the costs of audits prepared by the comptroller of the treasury and for the payment of fees for audits prepared by a licensed independent certified public accountant or firm. All audits shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards;

The corporation may, with prior approval of the comptroller of the treasury, contract with a licensed independent certified public accountant or firm for an additional annual financial audit of the corporation; provided, however, that the licensed certified public accountant or firm shall have no financial interest in any vendor with whom the corporation is under contract. If a licensed independent certified public accountant or firm is employed pursuant to this subdivision (4)(B), the audit contract between the corporation and the licensed independent certified public accountant or firm shall be on contract forms prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The corporation shall be responsible, as an operating expense, for the payment of fees for audits prepared pursuant to this subdivision (4)(B). Such audits shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and shall meet minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury;

A copy of any audit performed by the comptroller of the treasury or any independent certified public accountant or firm shall be transmitted to the governor, the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairs of the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives, the state treasurer and, if applicable, the comptroller of the treasury;

Submit to the department of finance and administration, the office of legislative budget analysis and the comptroller of the treasury by June 30 of each year a copy of the annual operating budget for the corporation for the next fiscal year. This annual operating budget shall be approved by the board and be on such forms as prescribed by the department of finance and administration;

For informational purposes only, submit to the department of finance and administration on September 1 of each year a proposed operating budget for the corporation for the succeeding fiscal year. This budget proposal shall also be accompanied by an estimate of the net lottery proceeds to be deposited into the lottery for education account during the succeeding fiscal year. This budget shall be on such forms as prescribed by the department of finance and administration; and

Adopt the same fiscal year as that used by state government.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2011, ch. 410, § 9(c); 2012, ch. 925, § 17; 2013, ch. 236, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Cross-References. Licensing of accountants, §62-1-101 et seq.